Oklahoma, session 2026, SB1661.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:


SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified


in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 2167.2 of Title 63, unless there


is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:


A. A blood service system shall comply with a physician’s order


prescribing for an individual an autologous or direct blood


donation.


B. A blood service system may charge a fee in an amount


reasonable and necessary to cover the administrative cost to the


blood service system of facilitating an autologous or direct blood


donation ordered by a physician under subsection A of this section.


C. A hospital licensed by the State Department of Health that


facilitates blood donations shall allow an individual on whom a

Req. No. 3125 Page 1


medical procedure is to be performed to provide an autologous or


direct blood donation a physician orders for the procedure.


SECTION 2. This act shall become effective November 1, 2026.




60-2-3125 DC 1/13/2026 9:26:02 PM







































Req. No. 3125 Page 2